Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-166
Offstreet parking; plans and specifications; coordination with traffic control program.

Before the issuance of any revenue bonds the city of the second class shall have an independent and qualified firm of engineers prepare plans and specifications for such improvements. In the preparation of the plans and specifications, the independent engineer shall collaborate and counsel with any city engineering or traffic departments so as to coordinate the program with the program for the control of traffic within such respective city.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 4, p. 187.